Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-559
Taxes and assessments; payment; collection; suit; powers of city treasurer.

All municipal taxes and all special assessments in cities of the metropolitan class shall be paid in cash. The city treasurer may sue for the recovery of any tax, in the name of city treasurer, or in the name of the city, and shall have all the rights of a creditor in such suits and in the enforcement of a judgment or decree.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 48, p. 492;

C.S.1922, § 3674;

C.S.1929, § 14-551;

R.S.1943, § 14-559;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 205.